District of Columbia statutes.
38-1208.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

“DCPS” means the District of Columbia Public Schools.

(3)

“UDC” means the University of the District of Columbia.

(4)

“VEST” means the Office of Vocational Education and Skills Training.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, Title VIII, § 801
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2202, 49 DCR 6968
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 70, 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 85(d), 52 DCR 2638
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 263(a), 62 DCR 1884

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-105, in par. (1), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 15-354 validated a previously made technical correction.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 repealed (1).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 263(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 263(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).